Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 3

Metropolitan Government Aid Funds

54-4-301. Counties to keep one fund.

Those counties having a metropolitan form of government shall keep all funds received under this chapter in one (1) fund to be used for the purposes set out in this chapter.

Acts 1977, ch. 139, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-411.

Comparative Legislation. State funds for local aid:

Ala. Code § 23-1-100 et seq.

Ark. Code § 27-72-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 32-5-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 178.150.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-9-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 231.450 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 136-66.1.

Va. Code § 33.1-23.01 et seq.

Collateral References. Highways
97.1 et seq.

54-4-302. Construction of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require those counties having a metropolitan form of government to keep separate from each other the funds received under this chapter, to keep separate accounting of the funds or to spend the funds in a particular service district.

Acts 1977, ch. 139, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-411.